District of Columbia statutes.
32-1612

Regional cooperation.

This subchapter encourages the Council to work with its Maryland and Virginia counterparts to develop a regional information sharing system that allows one-stops and welfare agencies in the District and surrounding jurisdictions to access information regarding regional employment opportunities, job training providers, and support services.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-150, § 13, 47 DCR 4644
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 129(h), 56 DCR 1117
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction by substituting “Council” for “Board”.